tests/heb.twoc
Alphabet

ם כ ה ג ש ז צ נ ל פ ע י ב ף ץ מ ך ת ח ד ס ר א ט ק ן

%[%+1sg%]:0 %[%+1pl%]:0 %[%+2sgm%]:0 %[%+2sgf%]:0 %[%+2plm%]:0 %[%+2plf%]:0 %[%+3sgm%]:0 %[%+3sgf%]:0 %[%+3plm%]:0 %[%+3plf%]:0
%[%-1sg%]:0 %[%-1pl%]:0 %[%-2sgm%]:0 %[%-2sgf%]:0 %[%-2plm%]:0 %[%-2plf%]:0 %[%-3sgm%]:0 %[%-3sgf%]:0 %[%-3plm%]:0 %[%-3plf%]:0

%<v%>
%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>
%<sg%>
%<pl%>
%<perf%>
%<impf%>
%<m%>
%<f%>

;

Sets

Prefix = %[%+1sg%] %[%+1pl%] %[%+2sgm%] %[%+2sgf%] %[%+2plm%] %[%+2plf%] %[%+3sgm%] %[%+3sgf%] %[%+3plm%] %[%+3plf%] ;
Suffix = %[%-1sg%] %[%-1pl%] %[%-2sgm%] %[%-2sgf%] %[%-2plm%] %[%-2plf%] %[%-3sgm%] %[%-3sgf%] %[%-3plm%] %[%-3plf%] ;

Rules

"Remove paths without matching suffix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ :* Fy:0 ;
   where Fx in Prefix
         Fy in Suffix
   matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature"
Fy:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fx:0 :* _ ;
   where Fx in Prefix
         Fy in Suffix
   matched ;
